Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3661.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [626.191] FACIAL RECOGNITION TECHNOLOGY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "face surveillance" means an automated or semiautomated process that assists in identifying an individual or capturing information about an individual, based on the physical characteristics of an individual's face; new text end new text begin (2) "face surveillance system" means a computer software or an application that performs face surveillance; new text end new text begin (3) "government entity" means a state or local unit of government or law enforcement agency; and new text end new text begin (4) "government official" means a person acting on behalf of a government entity. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Ban on government use of face surveillance. new text end new text begin A government entity or government official may not: new text end new text begin (1) obtain, retain, access, or use a face surveillance system or information obtained from a face surveillance system; or new text end new text begin (2) enter into an agreement or arrangement with a private entity to obtain, retain, access, or use a face surveillance system or information obtained from a face surveillance system. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) No data collected or derived from any use of face surveillance in violation of this section and no evidence derived from its use may be received in evidence in a trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or before a court, grand jury, department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other authority subject to state law. Face surveillance data collected or derived in violation of this section is considered unlawfully obtained and must be deleted upon discovery. new text end new text begin (b) A violation of this section constitutes an injury and a person may institute proceedings for injunctive relief, declaratory relief, or writ of mandate in a court of competent jurisdiction. An action instituted under this paragraph may be brought against the respective government entity and, if necessary to effectuate compliance with this section, any other government entity with possession, custody, or control of data subject to this section. new text end new text begin (c) A person who has been subjected to face recognition in violation of this section, or about whom information has been obtained, retained, accessed, or used in violation of this section, may institute proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction against the government entity and shall be entitled to recover actual damages, but not less than liquidated damages of $1,000 or $100 for each violation, whichever is greater. new text end new text begin (d) A court must award costs and reasonable attorney fees to a plaintiff who is the prevailing party in an action brought under paragraph (b) or (c). new text end new text begin (e) Violations of this section by a government official may be addressed through retraining, suspension, or termination, subject to due process requirements. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end